Maine, session 132, LD1435.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12708, as amended by PL 2021, c. 184, §§10 to 12, is further
amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§12708. Wildlife management areas and public access sites; boat launch
informational kiosks
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §12708, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Boat launch informational kiosks. The department shall provide reasonable space
on the department's informational kiosks located at state boat launch facilities to
municipalities and local lake associations and similar nonprofit organizations recognized
by the department or the municipalities in which the facilities are located. The department
shall also disseminate to the general public information about these associations and
organizations and program activities promoting healthy lake water quality and reducing the
risk of introduction of invasive aquatic species. For the purposes of this subsection,
"reasonable space" means an area of at least 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches.